Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2511
Service on foreign personal representative.

Service of process may be made upon the foreign personal representative who has submitted himself or herself to the jurisdiction of the court under section 30-2509 or is subject to jurisdiction under section 30-2510 in the manner provided for service of a summons in a civil action.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 217, UPC § 4-303;

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 45.